test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kaoiqtted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below) There are still problems
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kåiʹtted: # Verb 'to know' - full paradigm
     kåiʹtted+V+Inf: kåiʹtted
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kååitam
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kååitak
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kåitt
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kåiʹttep
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kåiʹttveʹted
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kåiʹtte
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: kååiʹtet
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kååiʹt
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [koiʹttem]
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [koiʹttiǩ]
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kooiʹti
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kooiʹtim, kooiʹtin]
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kooiʹtid]
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: koiʹtte
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: koiʹtteš
     kåiʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kåittam
     kåiʹtted+V+Pot+Sg1: [kooiʹtžem]
     kåiʹtted+V+Pot+Sg2: [kooiʹtžiǩ]
     kåiʹtted+V+Pot+Sg3: [kooiʹtež]
     kåiʹtted+V+Pot+Pl1: [kooiʹtžep, kooiʹtžim, kooiʹtžin]
     kåiʹtted+V+Pot+Pl2: [kooiʹtžid] 
     kåiʹtted+V+Pot+Pl3: [kooiʹtže]
     kåiʹtted+V+Pot+Sg4: [kooiʹtžet]
     kåiʹtted+V+Pot+ConNeg: [kooiʹtže]
     kåiʹtted+V+Cond+Sg1: kååitčem
     kåiʹtted+V+Cond+Sg2: kååitčiǩ
     kåiʹtted+V+Cond+Sg3: kååitči
     kåiʹtted+V+Cond+Pl1: [kååitčim, kååitčin, kååitčep]
     kåiʹtted+V+Cond+Pl2: kååitčid
     kåiʹtted+V+Cond+Pl3: kååitče
     kåiʹtted+V+Cond+Sg4: kååitčeš
     kåiʹtted+V+Cond+ConNeg: kååitče
     kåiʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg2: kååiʹt
     kåiʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg3: kååitas
     kåiʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl1: kåiʹttep
     kåiʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl2: kåiʹtted
     kåiʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl3: kåittaz
     kåiʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNeg: kååiʹt
     kåiʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNegII: koittu      # koittu
     kåiʹtted+V+Actio+Ess: kåiʹttmen
     kåiʹtted+V+Actio: kåiʹttem
     kåiʹtted+V+Act+PrsPrc: koiʹtti
     kåiʹtted+V+Act+PrfPrc: kåittam
     kåiʹtted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: koittum         # koittum
     kåiʹtted+V+VAbess: [kååiʹtkani, kååiʹtǩeännai]
     kåiʹtted+V+Ger+Ess: kååiʹteen
     kåiʹtted+V+Ger+Instr: kååiʹteeʹl
     kåiʹtted+V+Act+PrfPrc: kåittam
